Wisconsin, session 2025, AB600.
do enact as follows:AB600,11Section 1. 36.13 of the statutes is created to read:AB600,2,3236.13 Faculty tenure and probationary appointments. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:AB600,2,64(a) “Probationary appointment” means an appointment by the board held by a 5faculty member during the period which may precede a decision on a tenure 6appointment.AB600,2,87(b) “Tenure appointment” means an appointment for an unlimited period 8granted to a ranked faculty member by the board.AB600,2,149(2) Appointments. (a) Except as provided under par. (b), the board may 10grant a tenure appointment only upon the affirmative recommendation of the 11appropriate chancellor and the appropriate academic department or its functional 12equivalent. Neither the chancellor nor the academic department or its functional 13equivalent may base a tenure recommendation upon impermissible factors, as 14defined by the board by rule.AB600,2,1715(b) The board may grant a tenure appointment without the affirmative 16recommendation of the appropriate academic department or its functional 17equivalent if all of the following apply:AB600,2,19181. The board has the affirmative recommendation of the appropriate 19chancellor.AB600,3,412. A faculty committee authorized by the board by rule to review the negative 2recommendation of the academic department or its functional equivalent finds that 3the decision of the academic department or its functional equivalent was based 4upon impermissible factors, as defined by the board by rule.AB600,3,1553. The board has the affirmative recommendation of a committee appointed 6according to the policies and procedures of the appropriate institution to review the 7individual’s record with reference to criteria for tenure published by the institution 8under procedures established by the board by rule. No person may be appointed to 9the committee under this subdivision unless the person is knowledgeable or 10experienced in the individual’s academic field or in a substantially similar 11academic field. No member of the committee appointed under this subdivision may 12be a member of the academic department, or its functional equivalent, that made 13the negative recommendation. The committee appointed under this subdivision 14may not base its tenure recommendation upon impermissible factors, as defined by 15the board by rule.AB600,3,2016(c) A tenure appointment may be granted to any ranked faculty member who 17holds or will hold a half-time appointment or more. The proportion of time provided 18for in the appointment may not be diminished nor increased without the mutual 19consent of the faculty member and the institution subject only to sub. (5) and ss. 2036.21 and 36.22.AB600,4,321(d) A probationary appointment shall not exceed 7 consecutive academic years 22in a full-time position in an institution. A leave of absence, sabbatical, or a teacher 23improvement assignment does not constitute a break in continuous service and 1shall not be included in the 7-year period. The board may promulgate rules 2specifying additional circumstances that do not constitute a break in continuous 3service and that shall not be included in the 7-year period.AB600,4,74(3) Rules. The board and its several faculties, after consultation with 5appropriate students, shall promulgate rules for tenure and probationary 6appointments, for the review of faculty performance, and for the nonretention and 7dismissal of faculty members. Such rules shall be promulgated under ch. 227.AB600,4,118(4) Continuation of appointment. (a) Any person who holds a tenure 9appointment under ch. 36, 1971 stats., and ch. 37, 1971 stats., and related rules on 10July 9, 1974, shall continue to hold tenure as defined under those chapters and 11related rules.AB600,4,1612(b) Any person who holds the equivalent of a probationary appointment under 13ch. 36, 1971 stats., and ch. 37, 1971 stats., and related rules on July 9, 1974, shall 14continue to enjoy the contractual rights and guarantees as defined under those 15chapters and related rules, and may elect to be considered for tenure according to 16the procedures existing under that appointment or under sub. (2).AB600,4,1917(c) Any person who is not a ranked faculty member on August 15, 1991, and 18who is also described under subd. 1. or 2. shall be treated as a faculty member with 19the rank of associate professor for all purposes:AB600,4,22201. Any person who held an unranked faculty tenure appointment or unranked 21faculty concurrent tenure appointment under ch. 37, 1971 stats., prior to July 10, 221974.AB600,5,2232. Any person who held an unranked probationary appointment under ch. 37, 11971 stats., prior to July 10, 1974, and who subsequently received an unranked 2faculty tenure appointment or unranked faculty concurrent tenure appointment.AB600,5,93(5) Procedural guarantees. Any person having tenure may be dismissed 4only for just cause and only after due notice and hearing. Any person having a 5probationary appointment may be dismissed prior to the end of the person’s 6contract term only for just cause and only after due notice and hearing. The action 7and decision of the board in such matters shall be final, subject to judicial review 8under ch. 227. The board and its several faculties shall develop procedures for the 9notice and hearing that shall be promulgated by rule under ch. 227.AB600,5,1210(6) Limitation. Tenure and probationary appointments are in a particular 11institution. A tenure appointment is limited to the institution in which the 12appointment is held.AB600,213Section 2. 36.17 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB600,5,181436.17 (1) An appointment to a position listed in sub. (2) shall be a limited 15appointment and the appointment shall be at the pleasure of the board. A faculty 16member who has been granted tenure or a person holding an a tenured or 17academic staff appointment under s. ss. 36.13 and 36.15 shall not lose that 18appointment by accepting a limited appointment.AB600,319Section 3. 36.19 of the statutes is amended to read:AB600,5,232036.19 Other appointments. The board may make or authorize fixed term 21appointments for student assistants and employees in training, such as residents, 22interns, post-doctoral fellows or trainees or associates. Appointments made under 23this section shall not be subject to s. ss. 36.13 and 36.15.AB600,41Section 4. 36.21 of the statutes is amended to read:AB600,6,13236.21 Termination due to certain budget or program changes. 3Notwithstanding s. ss. 36.13 (4) and 36.15, the board may, with appropriate notice, 4terminate any faculty or academic staff appointment when such an action is 5deemed necessary due to a budget or program decision requiring program 6discontinuance, curtailment, modification, or redirection. No person may be 7employed at the institution within 2 years to perform reasonably comparable duties 8to those of the person whose appointment was terminated without first offering 9such person a reappointment. The board, after consultation with the faculty and 10chancellor of each institution, shall adopt procedures to be followed in the event of 11termination of academic staff under this section and the board may adopt 12procedures, consistent with s. 36.22, to be followed in the event of termination of 13faculty under this section and s. 36.22.AB600,514Section 5. 111.81 (7) (ar) of the statutes is amended to read:AB600,6,1815111.81 (7) (ar) Any employee who is employed by the University of Wisconsin 16System, except an employee who is assigned to the University of Wisconsin-17Madison, and except faculty, under s. 36.13 and except academic staff under s. 1836.15.AB600,619Section 6. 111.81 (7) (at) of the statutes is amended to read:AB600,6,2220111.81 (7) (at) Any employee who is employed by the University of Wisconsin 21System and assigned to the University of Wisconsin-Madison except faculty under 22s. 36.13 and except academic staff under s. 36.15.AB600,6,2323